Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.435

Diagnosed concussions of students—Report.

(1) The department must develop a procedure to, beginning in the 2020-21 school year, collect the information related to the diagnosed concussions of students as described in RCW 28A.600.192.

(2) Beginning October 1, 2021, by October 1st annually thereafter, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department shall report a summary of the diagnosed concussion information received in the prior school year to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The report must include rates, patterns, trends, and other relevant information.

[ 2020 c 347 s 2.]